District of Columbia statutes.
4-218.03

Unauthorized use of identification card.

Any person who sells any card or document issued by the District government to establish or verify eligibility for public assistance, or otherwise permits any person other than the recipient to whom it was issued to use such card or document to obtain public assistance which such user is not otherwise eligible to receive, shall be fined not more than $500, or imprisoned for not longer than one year, or both.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1803, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(cccc), 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-218.3.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(cccc) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(cccc) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(cccc) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(cccc) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(cccc) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).